Maryland, session 2025, SB0993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–404.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0993*

SENATE BILL 993
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) [and (3)], (3), AND (4) of this
subsection:
(i) An initial suspension may not be for less than 2 days nor more
than 30 days; and
(ii) Any subsequent suspension may not be for less than 15 days nor
more than 90 days.
(2) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, the
following suspension periods may apply to a suspension for an accumulation of points under
§ 16–402(a)(29) of this subtitle for a violation of § 21–902(b) or (c) of this article or a
suspension imposed under § 16–404.1(f)(1)(iii) of this subtitle:
(i) For a first conviction, not more than 6 months;
(ii) For a second conviction at least 5 years after the date of the first
conviction, not more than 9 months;
(iii) For a second conviction less than 5 years after the date of the
first conviction or for a third conviction, not more than 12 months; and
(iv) For a fourth or subsequent conviction, not more than 24 months.
(3) The Administration may issue a restrictive license for the period of the
suspension to an individual who participates in the Administration’s Ignition Interlock
System Program under § 16–404.1 of this subtitle.
(4) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ISSUE A RESTRICTIVE LICENSE FOR
THE PERIOD OF THE SUSPENSION TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PARTICIPATES IN THE
ADMINISTRATION’S INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEM PILOT PROGRAM
UNDER § 16–404.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(4)] (5) This subsection does not limit the authority of the
Administration to issue a restrictive license or modify a suspension imposed under this
subsection.
16–404.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “APPROVED SERVICE PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON WHO IS
CERTIFIED BY:

SENATE BILL 993 3
(I) THE ADMINISTRATION TO SERVICE, INSTALL, MONITOR,
CALIBRATE, AND PROVIDE INFORMATION ON INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE
SYSTEMS; AND
(II) A MANUFACTURER TO BE QUALIFIED TO SERVICE, INSTALL,
MONITOR, CALIBRATE, AND PROVIDE INFORMATION ON INTELLIGENT SPEED
ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS.
(3) “MANUFACTURER” MEANS A PERSON THAT MANUFACTURES
INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS.
(4) “PARTICIPANT” MEANS A PARTICIPANT IN THE INTELLIGENT
SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEM PILOT PROGRAM.
(5) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE
SYSTEM PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH AN INTELLIGENT
SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEM PILOT PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(2) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH A PROTOCOL FOR
THE PROGRAM THROUGH THE ADOPTION OF REGULATIONS THAT REQUIRE CERTAIN
MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR ALL SERVICE PROVIDERS WHO SERVICE, INSTALL,
MONITOR, CALIBRATE, AND PROVIDE INFORMATION ON INTELLIGENT SPEED
ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS.
(II) THE REGULATIONS SHALL REQUIRE THAT:
1. A SERVICE PROVIDER WHO APPLIES TO THE
ADMINISTRATION FOR CERTIFICATION AS AN APPROVED SERVICE PROVIDER
DEMONSTRATE THAT THE SERVICE PROVIDER IS ABLE TO COMPETENTLY SERVICE,
INSTALL, MONITOR, CALIBRATE, AND PROVIDE INFORMATION TO THE
ADMINISTRATION AT LEAST EVERY 30 DAYS ON INDIVIDUALS REQUIRED TO USE
INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS;
2. A SERVICE PROVIDER WHO APPLIES TO THE
ADMINISTRATION FOR CERTIFICATION AS AN APPROVED SERVICE PROVIDER BE
CERTIFIED BY A SIGNED AFFIDAVIT FROM THE MANUFACTURER THAT THE SERVICE
PROVIDER HAS BEEN TRAINED BY AN AUTHORIZED MANUFACTURER AND THAT THE
SERVICE PROVIDER IS COMPETENT TO SERVICE, INSTALL, MONITOR, CALIBRATE,
AND PROVIDE INFORMATION ON INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEMS;

SENATE BILL 993
3. APPROVED SERVICE PROVIDERS BE CONSIDERED TO
BE AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVES OF THE MANUFACTURER; AND
4. ANY SERVICE OF NOTICE ON AN APPROVED SERVICE
PROVIDER BE CONSIDERED TO BE SERVICE OF NOTICE ON THE MANUFACTURER
WHO CERTIFIED THE APPROVED SERVICE PROVIDER.
(C) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE A PARTICIPANT IF THE INDIVIDUAL HAS
ACCUMULATED POINTS IN AN AMOUNT THAT WOULD RESULT IN SUSPENSION OR
REVOCATION OF A DRIVER’S LICENSE UNDER § 16–404 OF THIS SUBTITLE DUE TO
ANY COMBINATION OF VIOLATIONS OF:
(I) § 16–402(A)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) § 16–402(A)(17) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) § 16–402(A)(24) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(IV) § 16–402(A)(27) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(V) § 16–402(A)(33) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(VI) § 16–402(A)(45) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PARTICIPATES IN THE PROGRAM SHALL BE
A PARTICIPANT FOR 1 YEAR.
(3) IF AN INDIVIDUAL IS SUBJECT TO THIS SUBSECTION AND FAILS TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM OR SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETE THE PROGRAM, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL SUSPEND, NOTWITHSTANDING § 16–208 OF THIS TITLE,
THE INDIVIDUAL’S DRIVER’S LICENSE UNTIL THE INDIVIDUAL SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETES THE PROGRAM.
(D) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(I) MODIFY A SUSPENSION AND ISSUE A RESTRICTIVE
DRIVER’S LICENSE REQUIRING THE USE OF AN INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE
SYSTEM FOR THE DURATION OF PROGRAM PARTICIPATION TO A PARTICIPANT WHO
IS OTHERWISE ELIGIBLE FOR THE LICENSE; AND
(II) REINSTATE THE DRIVER’S LICENSE, SUBJECT TO A
RESTRICTION REQUIRING THE USE OF AN INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEM

SENATE BILL 993 5
FOR THE DURATION OF PROGRAM PARTICIPATION, OF A PARTICIPANT WHOSE
DRIVER’S LICENSE HAS BEEN REVOKED.
(2) A NOTICE OF SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF A DRIVER’S
LICENSE AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SENT TO AN
INDIVIDUAL SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROGRAM AND HOW
INDIVIDUALS MAY PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH A FEE FOR
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM THAT IS SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE COSTS OF
THE PROGRAM.
(E) A PARTICIPANT MAY NOT OPERATE A MOTOR VEHICLE IN VIOLATION OF
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE PROGRAM.
(F) A PARTICIPANT IS CONSIDERED TO HAVE BEGUN PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAM ON THE DAY THE INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEM IS INSTALLED
IN THE PARTICIPANT’S MOTOR VEHICLE.
(G) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL REQUIRED TO USE AN INTELLIGENT SPEED
ASSISTANCE SYSTEM UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) SHALL BE MONITORED BY THE ADMINISTRATION; AND
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, SHALL PAY THE FEE REQUIRED BY THE ADMINISTRATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(3) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL WAIVE THE FEE REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS INDIGENT.
(H) IF AN INDIVIDUAL COMPLETES THE PROGRAM AND THE INDIVIDUAL’S
LICENSE IS NOT REFUSED, REVOKED, SUSPENDED, OR CANCELED UNDER ANOTHER
PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ISSUE IMMEDIATELY A
LICENSE TO THE INDIVIDUAL.
(I) (1) IF THE ADMINISTRATION REMOVES AN INDIVIDUAL FROM THE
PROGRAM BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL VIOLATED ANY REQUIREMENT OF THE
PROGRAM, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY ALLOW THE INDIVIDUAL TO REENTER THE
PROGRAM AFTER A PERIOD OF 30 DAYS FROM THE DATE OF REMOVAL.
(2) IF AN INDIVIDUAL REENTERS THE PROGRAM UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE INDIVIDUAL SHALL PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM FOR 3

SENATE BILL 993
MONTHS IN ADDITION TO THE PERIOD OF TIME THAT WAS NECESSARY FOR
SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF THE PROGRAM AT THE TIME THE INDIVIDUAL WAS
REMOVED FROM THE PROGRAM.
(J) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE REQUIREMENTS FOR A PARTICIPANT TO OPERATE A MOTOR VEHICLE
EQUIPPED WITH AN INTELLIGENT SPEED ASSISTANCE SYSTEM IN A SAFE MANNER,
AS DETERMINED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before December 30,
2028, the Motor Vehicle Administration shall report to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly on the
implementation of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and 9 months and, at the
end of June 30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.